Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1440.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 69 O.S. 2021, Section 1705, as


amended by Section 572, Chapter 486, O.S.L. 2025 (69 O.S. Supp.


2025, Section 1705), is amended to read as follows:


Section 1705. The Oklahoma Turnpike Authority is hereby


authorized and empowered:


(a) To adopt bylaws for the regulation of its affairs and


conduct of its business.


(b) To adopt an official seal and alter the same at pleasure.

Req. No. 3091 Page 1


(c) To maintain an office at such place or places within the


state as it may designate.


(d) To sue and be sued in contract, reverse condemnation,


equity, mandamus and similar actions in its own name, plead and be


impleaded; provided, that any and all actions at law or in equity


against the Authority shall be brought in the county in which the


principal office of the Authority shall be located, or in the county


of the residence of the plaintiff, or the county where the cause of


action arose. All privileges granted to the Authority and duties


enjoined upon the Authority by the provisions of Sections 1701


through 1734 of this title may be enforced in a court of competent


jurisdiction in an action in mandamus.


(e) To construct, maintain, repair and operate turnpike


projects and highways, with their access and connecting roads, at


such locations and on such routes as it shall determine to be


feasible and economically sound; provided, that until specifically


authorized by the Legislature, the Authority shall be authorized to


construct and operate toll turnpikes only at the following


locations:


(1) The Turner Turnpike between Oklahoma City and Tulsa.


(2) The Southwestern (H.E. Bailey) Turnpike between Oklahoma


City and Wichita Falls, Texas.


(3) The Northeastern (Will Rogers) Turnpike between Tulsa and


Joplin, Missouri.

Req. No. 3091 Page 2


(4) The Eastern (Indian Nation) Turnpike between Tulsa and


Paris, Texas, including all or any part thereof between McAlester


and the Red River south of Hugo.


(5) The Cimarron Turnpike between Tulsa and Interstate Highway


north of Perry, including a connection to Stillwater.


(6) The Muskogee Turnpike between Broken Arrow and Interstate


Highway 40 west of Webbers Falls.


(7) All or any part of an extension of the Muskogee Turnpike,


beginning at a point on Interstate Highway 40 near the present south


terminus of the Muskogee Turnpike, and extending in a southeasterly


direction on an alignment near Stigler, Poteau and Heavener to the


vicinity of the Arkansas State Line to furnish access to Hot


Springs, Texarkana, Shreveport and New Orleans.


(8) A tollgate on the Turner Turnpike in the vicinity of


Luther, Oklahoma, and in the vicinity of the intersection of State


Highway 33 and Turner Turnpike in Creek County, Oklahoma, or in the


vicinity of the intersection of State Highway 33 and Turner Turnpike


or U.S. Highway 66 in Creek County, Oklahoma, from any monies


available to the Authority.


(9) Add on the Will Rogers Turnpike a northbound automatic


tollgate onto State Highway 28 and a southbound on-ramp from State


Highway 28.


(10) A turnpike or any part or parts thereof beginning in the


vicinity of Duncan extending east to the vicinity of the City of

Req. No. 3091 Page 3


Davis, and extending in a northeasterly direction, by way of the


vicinity of the City of Ada, to a connection in the vicinity of


Henryetta or in the vicinity of the intersection of State Highway 48


and Interstate 40; and a turnpike or any part or parts thereof from


the vicinity of Snyder extending north to the vicinity of Woodward.


(11) A turnpike or any part or parts thereof beginning at a


point in the vicinity of Ponca City, or at a point on the Kansas-


Oklahoma state boundary line east of the Arkansas River and west of


the point where Oklahoma State Highway No. 18 intersects said state


boundary line, and extending in a southeasterly direction to a


connection with the Tulsa Urban Expressway System in the general


area of the Port of Catoosa.


(12) All or any part of an Oklahoma City toll expressway system


connecting the residential, industrial and State Capitol Complex in


the north part of Oklahoma City with the residential, industrial and


Will Rogers World Airport Complex in the south and southwest parts


of Oklahoma City.


(13) A turnpike (The Industrial Parkway) or any part or parts


thereof beginning at a point on the Oklahoma-Kansas state boundary


line between the point where U.S. Highway 66 intersects the boundary


line and the northeast corner of Oklahoma and ending by means of a


connection or connections with Shreveport, Louisiana, and Houston,


Texas, in southeastern Oklahoma and at no point to exceed thirty


(30) miles west of the Missouri or Arkansas border.

Req. No. 3091 Page 4


(14) A turnpike or any part or parts thereof beginning in the


vicinity of Velma or County Line to a point intersecting with


Interstate 35 in the area south of Davis.


(15) A turnpike or any part or parts thereof beginning in the


vicinity of Watonga and extending south and/or east to the vicinity


of north and/or west Oklahoma City.


(16) A tollgate on the Will Rogers Turnpike near the


intersection of State Highway 137 and the Will Rogers Turnpike,


located south of Quapaw.


(17) A tollgate on the Muskogee Turnpike in the vicinity of


Porter, Oklahoma, a tollgate on the Will Rogers Turnpike in the


vicinity of Adair, Oklahoma, a tollgate on the Turner Turnpike in


the vicinity of Luther, Oklahoma, and a tollgate on the H.E. Bailey


Turnpike at Elgin, Oklahoma, from any monies available to the


Authority.


(18) A tollgate on the Turner Turnpike in the vicinity of


Wellston, Oklahoma, from any monies available to the Authority.


(19) A tollgate on the Muskogee Turnpike in the vicinity of


Brushy Mountain, Oklahoma, and in the vicinity of Elm Grove,


Oklahoma, from any monies available to the Authority.


(20) All or any part of an Oklahoma City Outer Loop expressway


system beginning in the vicinity of I-35 and the Turner Turnpike and


extending west into Canadian County and then south to I-40; and then


south and east to I-35 in the vicinity of Moore and Norman; and then

Req. No. 3091 Page 5


extending east and north to I-40 east of Tinker Field; and then


extending north to the Turner Turnpike to complete the Outer Loop.


(21) All or any part of the Tulsa south bypass expressway


system beginning in the vicinity of the Turner Turnpike near Sapulpa


and extending south and east to U.S. 75 in the vicinity of 96th


Street to 121st Street; and then east across the Arkansas River to a


connection with the Mingo Valley Expressway; and then south and/or


east to a point on the Tulsa-Wagoner County Line near 131st Street


south in the city of Broken Arrow.


(22) A new turnpike or any part thereof from near the west gate


of the Will Rogers Turnpike south to the west end of south Tulsa


Turnpike at the Tulsa-Wagoner County Line.


(23) A new turnpike or any parts thereof from the vicinity of


the connection between State Highway 33 and U.S. 69 easterly to the


Arkansas State Line.


(24) A four-lane extension of the Muskogee Turnpike from


Interstate Highway 40 west of Webbers Falls to the Poteau vicinity.


(25) A new turnpike or any part or parts thereof beginning at a


point in the vicinity of northwest Tulsa, and extending in a


northwesterly direction, by means of a connection or connections


with the cities of Pawhuska and Newkirk, to a point intersecting in


the vicinity of U.S. Highway No. 77 and the Kansas State Line.


(26) A full access interchange on the Indian Nation Turnpike


south of Interstate 40, in the vicinity of Henryetta, Oklahoma, and

Req. No. 3091 Page 6


in the vicinity of the proposed theme park, museum or an industrial


facility which qualifies for the Oklahoma Quality Jobs Program Act,


from any monies available to the Authority.


(27) A new turnpike beginning at a point directly west of the


Arkansas line and four-laning Highway 70 from that point to the


farthest western reach of Highway 70 creating a southern route


through Oklahoma.


(28) A new turnpike and bridge or any parts thereof from a


point in the vicinity of the city of Mustang southerly across the


South Canadian River to the H.E. Bailey Turnpike in the vicinity of


the city of Tuttle; and then easterly across the South Canadian


River to a point in the vicinity of the city of Norman.


(29) A new turnpike or any parts thereof beginning at a point


in the vicinity of the city of Altus and extending in a


northwesterly direction to a point in the vicinity of the city of


Sayre.


(30) A new turnpike or any parts thereof beginning at a point


in the vicinity of the city of Enid and extending in a westerly


direction to a point in the vicinity of the city of Woodward.


(31) An on- and off-ramp or any parts thereof at Fletcher,


Oklahoma, in the vicinity of the Interstate 44 and State Highway 277


intersection. Any existing on- or off-ramp or any parts thereof in


the vicinity of Fletcher, Oklahoma, shall not be removed and shall


be maintained pursuant to Section 1701 et seq. of this title.

Req. No. 3091 Page 7


(32) A new bridge crossing the Arkansas River between South


Delaware Avenue and Memorial Drive in Tulsa County. This project


shall commence upon a determination by the Oklahoma Transportation


Authority that such bridge shall be self-sufficient at some point


over a thirty-year time period from the toll charges associated with


the bridge project.


(33) An exit ramp or any parts thereof from the eastbound lane


of the Turner Turnpike at 96th Street in Tulsa.


(34) An on- and off-ramp or any parts thereof on the Cimarron


Turnpike in the vicinity of the northside of the Glencoe, Oklahoma,


municipal limits.


(35) A new turnpike or any parts thereof beginning at


Interstate 44 at or near its intersection with 49th West Avenue,


past State Highway 64/412, turning northeasterly, crossing 41st West


Avenue, and continuing eastward to the L.L. Tisdale Expressway in


Tulsa, Oklahoma.


The Authority’s approval of any contract to undertake the design


of a new route of an authorized turnpike project shall take place in


an open and public meeting held in compliance with the Oklahoma Open


Meeting Act. After such meeting, the Authority shall, within ninety


(90) days, submit a report electronically to the Governor, the


members of the Legislature, and to the elected officials of any


municipality or county where the new route shall be located,


inclusive of conceptual project maps and preliminary project

Req. No. 3091 Page 8


details. Such report shall also be published on the website of the


Authority.


After receipt of such report, any municipality or county where


the new route shall be located shall file a special resolution


calling for an election to approve such route, as provided by


Section 3-101 of Title 26 of the Oklahoma Statutes. The election


shall be conducted in accordance with applicable election laws. The


registered voters of the municipality or county shall vote on the


question to approve such route by separate ballot, which shall be


substantially in the following form:


“For approval of the proposed turnpike route:


( ) Yes.


( ) No.”


After the results of such election have been certified, if the


majority in any municipality or county is against the proposed


turnpike route, the Authority shall revise the design of the route


to avoid such municipality or county.


All access roads, interchanges, or lead roads connecting such


turnpikes with existing highways must be built by funds furnished by


the Authority.


The minimum and maximum wages for the construction of the roads,


highways and projects provided for in Sections 1701 through 1734 of


this title shall be in accordance with the schedules of wages used


or adopted by the Commission in construction of state highways.

Req. No. 3091 Page 9


The Authority is hereby authorized to enter into contracts or


agreements with agencies and instrumentalities of other states or


the national government for construction, maintenance and operation


of interstate turnpikes or highways.


The Authority is hereby required to construct and install


automatic tollgates on the Will Rogers Turnpike at State Highway No.


near Adair.


(f) To issue turnpike revenue bonds of the Authority, payable


solely from revenues, including the revenues accruing to the trust


fund created by Sections 1701 through 1734 of this title, for the


purpose of paying all or any part of the cost of any one or more


turnpike projects. Provided that any bonds issued for the


construction of the proposed turnpike referred to in subparagraphs


(10), (20), (21) and (22) of paragraph (e) of this section shall be


issued as one issue for all four of the proposed turnpikes and shall


be financed, constructed and operated under one bond indenture.


(g) To fix and revise from time to time tolls for the use of


any turnpike projects.


Any common carrier having authority at the time of opening any


turnpike project to operate upon a highway approximately paralleling


the turnpike project shall be granted without further showing


authority to operate over the turnpike project to all municipalities


which such carrier is serving at the time the turnpike project is



Req. No. 3091 Page 10


opened to traffic. But nothing herein shall be construed as


granting any new operation rights to any common carriers.


(h) To acquire, hold, and dispose of real and personal property


in the exercise of its powers and the performance of its duties.


(i) To acquire in the name of the Authority by purchase or


otherwise on such terms and conditions and in such manner as it may


deem proper, or by exercise of the right of condemnation in manner


hereinafter provided, such public or private lands, including public


parks, playgrounds, or reservations, or parts thereof or rights


therein, rights-of-way, property, rights, easements, and interests,


as it may deem necessary for carrying out the provisions of Sections


1701 through 1734 of this title; provided, that all public property


damaged in carrying out the powers granted by Sections 1701 through


1734 of this title shall be restored or repaired and placed in its


original condition as nearly as practicable.


(j) To designate, except as is provided for herein, the


location, and establish, limit and control such points of ingress to


and egress from each turnpike project as may be necessary or


desirable in the judgment of the Authority to insure the proper


operation and maintenance of such project, and to prohibit entrance


to such project from any point or points not so designated.


(k) To make and enter into all contracts and agreements


necessary or incidental to the performance of its duties and the


execution of its powers, and to employ consulting engineers,

Req. No. 3091 Page 11


attorneys, accountants, construction and financial experts,


superintendents, managers, and such other employees and agents as


may be necessary in its judgment, and to fix their compensation;


provided, that all such expenses shall be payable solely from the


proceeds of turnpike revenue bonds issued under the provisions of


Sections 1701 through 1734 of this title or from revenues; provided,


further, no attorney employed by the Authority, nor any member of


any law firm of which the attorney may be connected, shall ever be


paid any fee or compensation for any special or extraordinary


services.


(l) To receive and accept from any federal agency grants for or


in aid of the construction of any turnpike project, provided, the


acceptance of such grants will not reduce the amount of federal aid


for the construction, repair, or maintenance of farm-to-market roads


and other highways and bridges in this state; and to receive and


accept aid or contributions from any source of either money,


property, labor, or other things of value, to be held, used, and


applied only for the purposes for which such grants and


contributions may be made.


(m) To adopt such rules, and to do any and all things necessary


to comply with rules, regulations, or requirements of the Bureau of


Public Roads, Multistate Economic Development Regional Commission,


as defined in Sections 1151 through 1153, inclusive, of Title 74 of


the Oklahoma Statutes, Ozarka Region Commission or any other federal

Req. No. 3091 Page 12


agency administering any law enacted by the Congress of the United


States to aid or encourage the construction of highways.


(n) To do all things necessary or convenient to carry out the


powers expressly granted in Sections 1701 through 1734 of this


title. The design standards for all paving shall comply with the


design standards of the American Association of State Highway and


Transportation Officials as modified by the Oklahoma Department of


Transportation. All contracts for construction work on turnpike


projects shall be let to the lowest responsible bidder, or bidders,


after notice by publication in a newspaper published in the county


where the work is to be done in two consecutive weekly issues of the


newspaper. In all cases where more than eight (8) miles of


construction is let at the same time and is not an advertisement for


a surface-treatment-only project, such advertisement shall provide


for bids on sections of the turnpike not to exceed eight (8) miles.


If the project advertised is a surface-treatment-only project of


more than twenty (20) miles of road, the advertisement shall provide


for bids on sections of the road no longer than twenty (20) miles,


as well as bids on the project as a whole. Subject to the following


restrictions and limitations, the Authority shall, when contracting


for construction work, divide such work into paving projects, bridge


projects, including underpasses and overpasses, and earthmoving or


miscellaneous projects, according to the type of work to be done.


Each project shall be let under a separate contract or contracts and

Req. No. 3091 Page 13


no contract or project shall include more than one of such types of


construction work. Each contract for construction work shall


contain a provision that ninety percent (90%) of all labor employed


on the project shall be residents of Oklahoma. However, contracts


for bridges may include earthwork and structures for the approaches


thereto.


(o) It shall be unlawful for any member, officer or employee of


the Authority to transact with the Authority, either directly or


indirectly, any business for profit of such member, officer, or


employee; and any person, firm, or corporation knowingly


participating therein shall be equally liable for violation of this


provision.


The term “business for profit” shall include, but not be limited


to, the acceptance or payment of any fee, commission, gift, or


consideration to such member, officer, or employee.


Violation of this provision shall constitute a Class D1 felony


offense punishable by incarceration as provided for in subsections B


through F of Section 20N of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes, or a


fine of not less than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) and not more


than Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00), or both such imprisonment


and fine.


(p) In the event of a national emergency, the Authority,


subject to any vested rights or claims, may enter into contracts


with the federal government or any authorized agency thereof to

Req. No. 3091 Page 14


allow the federal government or agency thereof to use such turnpikes


partly or exclusively during the existence of such emergency,


provided, that the federal government agrees in such contract to


pay, during the term of such contract, an amount sufficient, when


added to any tolls collected, to meet all operating and maintenance


expenses, interest payments, and the minimum sinking fund and


reserve requirements of the trust agreement for the turnpike covered


by the contract.


(q) All meetings of the Authority shall be open public


meetings, and all records shall be public records, except when


considering personnel or litigation.


SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 69 O.S. 2021, Section 1718, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 1718. A. The Authority is authorized in its discretion


to file an application with the Supreme Court of Oklahoma for the


approval of any bonds to be issued hereunder, and exclusive original


jurisdiction is hereby conferred upon the Supreme Court to hear and


determine each such application. It shall be the duty of the Court


to give such applications precedence over the other business of the


Court and to consider and pass upon the applications and any


protests which may be filed thereto as speedily as possible.


B. Notice of the hearing on each application shall be given by


a notice published in a newspaper of general circulation in the


state that on a day named the Authority will ask the Court to hear

Req. No. 3091 Page 15


its application and approve the bonds, which shall be published one


time not less than ten (10) days prior to the date named for the


hearing. Notice shall also be given via certified mail to all real


property owners within one (1) mile of the proposed project route to


be bonded, which shall be broadly similar to the notice to be


published in a newspaper of general circulation. Such notice shall


inform all persons interested that they may file protests against


the issuance of the bonds and be present at the hearing and contest


the legality thereof.


Such notice shall be published one time not less than ten (10)


days prior to the date named for the hearing and the


C. The hearing may be adjourned from time to time in the


discretion of the Court.


D. If the Court shall be satisfied that the bonds have been


properly authorized in accordance with this article and that when


issued, they will constitute valid obligations in accordance with


their terms, the Court shall render its written opinion approving


the bonds and shall fix the time within which a petition for


rehearing may be filed. The decision of the Court shall be a


judicial determination of the validity of the bonds, shall be


conclusive as to the Authority, its officers and agents, and


thereafter the bonds so approved and the revenues pledged to their


payment shall be incontestable in any court in the State of


Oklahoma.

Req. No. 3091 Page 16


SECTION 3. REPEALER 69 O.S. 2021, Section 1722, is


hereby repealed.


SECTION 4. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-3091 MSBB 1/7/2026 1:33:29 PM







































Req. No. 3091 Page 17